Tennessee, session 114, SB1705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3001(c)(1)(B)(i), is amended by
adding "attendance," before "academic," wherever it appears.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3009, is amended by adding
the following new subsections:
(o)
(1) If a student is enrolled in a home school operated pursuant to § 49-6-
3050(a)(1), but was previously enrolled in an LEA and receiving tier two or tier
three interventions pursuant to the LEA's progressive truancy plan, then the
director of schools shall report the student's absences to the judge with juvenile
jurisdiction in the county in which the student resides.
(2) Each case must be dealt with in such manner as the judge may
determine to be in the best interest of the student, consistent with §§ 37-1-132,
37-1-168, and 37-1-169. In the event a student in kindergarten through grade
twelve (K-12) is adjudicated to be unruly because the student has accumulated
five (5) days or more of unexcused absences during any school year, the judge
may assess a fine of up to fifty dollars ($50.00) or five (5) hours of community
service, in the discretion of the judge, against the parent or legal guardian of the
student.
SB1705
010134
- 1 -

(3) A referral to juvenile court for conduct described in this subsection (o)
must be accompanied by a statement from the director of schools certifying that:
(A) The school applied the progressive truancy interventions of
the progressive truancy plan adopted under subsection (d) for the student
while the student was enrolled in the LEA; and
(B) The student is now enrolled in a home school operated
pursuant to § 49-6-3050(a)(1).
(p) If a student transfers during the school year, then the number of unexcused
absences accumulated in the school year by the student at the school or LEA from
which the student is transferring must be included in the number of unexcused absences
for the student at the receiving school or LEA for purposes of this section.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3009(i), is amended by adding
"or subsection (o), if applicable" after "with subsection (h)".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3007, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(i) If a student transfers during the school year, then the number of unexcused
absences accumulated in the school year by the student at the school or LEA from
which the student is transferring must be included in the number of unexcused absences
for the student at the receiving school or LEA for purposes of this section.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010134